Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1308.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 33STORM WATER MANAGEMENTSec.3301. Legislative findings.3302 3301 . Definitions. 3303 3302 . Storm water management fee. § 3301. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) Inadequate management of accelerated runoff of storm <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 water resulting from development throughout a watershed:(i) increases flood flows and velocities;(ii) contributes to erosion and sedimentation;(iii) overtaxes the carrying capacity of streams and storm sewers;(iv) greatly increases the cost of public facilities to carry and control storm water;(v) undermines flood plain management and flood control efforts in downstream communities;(vi) reduces groundwater recharge; and(vii) threatens public health and safety.(2) A comprehensive program of storm water management, including reasonable regulation of development and activities causing accelerated runoff, is fundamental to the public health, safety and welfare and the protection of the people of this Commonwealth, their resources and the environment.(3) Local administration and management of storm water is consistent with the Commonwealth's duty as trustee of natural resources and the people's constitutional right to the preservation of natural, economic, scenic, aesthetic, recreational and historic values of the environment.(4) Municipalities and other local government entities cannot adequately plan, regulate and mitigate the impacts of storm water without the coordination and contributions of the Commonwealth and its instrumentalities to address the impacts of impervious surfaces on public property.§ 3302 § 3301 . Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1308PN1903 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Impervious surface." As follows:(1) An area, material, structure, surface or improvement that does not allow or that reduces or prevents infiltration of water into soil.(2) The term includes:(i) Compacted dirt, gravel, concrete or asphalt.(ii) A roadway, sidewalk, parking lot, driveway, patio, roof, garage or storage shed."Storm water." Drainage runoff from the surface of land resulting from precipitation or snow or ice melt.§ 3303 3302 . Storm water management fee. If a municipal corporation or municipal authority performs storm water planning, management and implementation and charges or imposes a reasonable fee to owners of property:(1) The fees may be charged or imposed on the Commonwealth, or a department, board, commission or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, for property owned by the Commonwealth or the department, board, commission or instrumentality of the Commonwealth.(2) An entity otherwise exempt from taxation may not be excused from payment of the fee solely on the basis of the tax-exempt status of the entity.Section 2. Section 5602 of Title 53 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Impervious surface." As follows:20250HB1308PN1903 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An area, material, structure, surface or improvement that does not allow or that reduces or prevents infiltration of water into soil.(2) The term includes:(i) Compacted dirt, gravel, concrete or asphalt.(ii) A roadway, sidewalk, parking lot, driveway, patio, roof, garage or storage shed.* * *Section 3. Section 5607(d)(34) of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 5607. Purposes and powers.* * *(d) Powers.--Every authority may exercise all powers necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the purposes set forth in this section, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following rights and powers:* * *(34) In the case of an authority that performs storm water planning, management and implementation, to charge or impose reasonable and uniform rates [may be based in whole or in part on property characteristics, which may include installation and maintenance of best management practices approved and inspected by the authority.] to owners of property that benefit from the services in accordance with the following provisions:(i) The rates shall be based on property contribution to storm water runoff, including the property's impervious surface as determined by the authority or the installation and maintenance of onsite best management practices approved and inspected by the 20250HB1308PN1903 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority.(ii) All properties containing an impervious surface are presumed to benefit from an authority's storm water planning, management and implementation.(iii) The rates may be charged by one or a combination of the following methods:(A) On all properties located in the service area of the authority.(B) On all properties that are served by or benefit from a specific storm water project or plan.(C) By establishing a storm water management district and charging the rate on the owners of all properties within the district.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1308PN1903 - 5 - 123456789101112131415